tests/morphophonology/word-final-j.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] various not working stuff from the corpa/corpus.kaz.txt":
    ай<n><px3sp><gen> : аеның
    ай<n><px3sp><abl> : аеннан
    ай<n><px3sp><loc> : аенда
    музей<n><px3sp><nom> : музее
    азай<v><iv><prc_perf> : азаеп
    җый<v><tv><coop><ifi><p1><pl> : җыештык
    уй<n><px3sp><loc> : уенда
    көй<n><px3sp><loc> : көендә
